Utah statutes.
63B-9-103 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Other capital facility authorizations and intent language.

(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Utah State University use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a renovation and expansion of the Edith Bowen School under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the University of Utah use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a College of Science Math Center under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the University of Utah use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a Burbidge Athletics and Academics Building under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may not request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(4)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the University of Utah use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct an expansion to the bookstore under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may not request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(5)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the University of Utah use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a Health Sciences/Basic Sciences Building under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(6)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Weber State University use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct an expansion to the stadium under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may not request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(7)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Utah Valley State College use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a baseball stadium under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the college may not request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(8)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Southern Utah University use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a weight training room under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may not request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(9)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Snow College may lease land at the Snow College Richfield campus to a private developer for the construction and operation of student housing;

(b)  the oversight and inspection of the construction comply with Section 63A-5-206;

(c)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(d)  the college may not request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(10)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Salt Lake Community College may lease land at the Jordan campus to Jordan School District for the construction and operation of an Applied Technology Education Center;

(b)  the oversight and inspection of the construction comply with Section 63A-5-206;

(c)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(d)  the college may not request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(11)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Department of Transportation exchange its maintenance station at Kimball Junction for property located near Highway 40 in Summit County; and

(b)  the Department of Transportation use federal funds, rent paid by the Salt Lake Organizing Committee for the use of the maintenance station, and any net proceeds resulting from the exchange of property to construct a replacement facility under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated.

(12)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Department of Transportation sell surplus property in Utah County;

(b)  the Department of Transportation use funds from that sale to remodel existing space and add an addition to the Region 3 Complex; and

(c)  the project cost not exceed the funds received through sale of property.

(13)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Workforce Services use proceeds from property sales to purchase additional property adjacent to its state-owned facility in Logan.

(14) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that, because only partial funding is provided for the Heat Plant/Infrastructure Project at Utah State University, the balance necessary to complete this project be addressed by future Legislatures, either through appropriations or through the issuance of bonds.

(b) (i)  In compliance with Section 63A-5-207, the division may enter into contracts for amounts not to exceed the anticipated full project funding but may not allow work to be performed on those contracts in excess of the funding already authorized by the Legislature.

(ii)  Those contracts shall contain a provision for termination of the contract for the convenience of the state as required by Section 63G-6-601.

(c)  It is also the intent of the Legislature that this authorization to the division does not bind future Legislatures to fund the Heat Plant/Infrastructure Project at Utah State University.

